Maine, session 132, LD1594.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 2 MRSA §2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 488, §2, is further amended to read:
§2. Expense account
The "Governor's Expense Account" expense account must be credited with $40,000
$30,000 annually. This appropriation must be available for expenditure by the Governor at
the Governor's discretion. This account is not subject to audit, except as to total amount to
be paid. The Governor, on a quarterly basis, shall provide an accounting of expenses made
from the Governor's expense account and post that accounting on the Governor's publicly
accessible website.